test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kumpp_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kuʹmpp â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     kuʹmpp+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: kuʹmpp
     kuʹmpp+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: kuuʹmp
     kuʹmpp+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: kuuʹmp
     kuʹmpp+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: kuʹmppe
     kuʹmpp+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: kuuʹmpest
     kuʹmpp+N+Sg+Com+Indef: kuuʹmpin
     kuʹmpp+N+Ess+Indef: kuʹmppen
     kuʹmpp+N+Par+Indef: kuʹmpped
     kuʹmpp+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [kuuʹmptaa, kuuʹmptää]
     kuʹmpp+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: kuuʹmp
     kuʹmpp+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: kuuʹmpi
     kuʹmpp+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: kuuʹmpid
     kuʹmpp+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: kuuʹmpid
     kuʹmpp+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: kuuʹmpin
     kuʹmpp+N+Pl+Com+Indef: kuuʹmpivuiʹm
     kuʹmpp+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [kuuʹmpitaa, kuuʹmpitää]
     
